Connecticut, session 2026, SB00032.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 32-4i of the general statutes be amended to increase the
annual expenditure on the Learn Here, Live Here program to not more
than five million dollars and to make such program available only to
individuals whose income is seventy-five thousand dollars or less.